North Carolina, session 2025, HB1088.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for traffic signal preemption
technology to allow real-time signal changes prioritizing first responder vehicles, reducing
response times and improving intersection safety.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1088-v-1*